Maine, session 132, LD1215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §11205 is enacted to read:
§11205. Municipal ordinance compliance
In addition to the requirements and restrictions of this chapter, an offender shall comply
with any applicable municipal ordinances adopted pursuant to Title 30-A, section 3014,
subsection 2.
Sec. 2. 34-A MRSA §11275 is enacted to read:
§11275. Municipal ordinance compliance
In addition to the requirements and restrictions of this chapter, an offender shall comply
with any applicable municipal ordinances adopted pursuant to Title 30-A, section 3014,
subsection 2.
Sec. 3. Sex Offender Management and Risk Assessment Advisory
Commission; study. The Sex Offender Management and Risk Assessment Advisory
Commission, established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 34-A, section
11401, shall conduct a study and develop recommendations regarding statewide residency
restrictions for sex offenders. In conducting the study, the commission shall evaluate
whether residency restrictions for sex offenders improve public safety, the best
implementation methods for residency restrictions and any constitutional or legal issues
associated with sex offender residency restrictions. No later than December 3, 2025, the
commission shall submit a report containing the findings and recommendations of this
study, including any proposed legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal
Justice and Public Safety. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out
legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.